Utah statutes.
53B-3-110.   Fines and forfeitures -- Disposition.
All fines and forfeitures collected by any justice court judge and one-half of
all the fines and forfeitures collected by the clerk of any district court for
a violation of any of this chapter are remitted to the state treasurer to be
credited to the general operating fund of the state institution of higher
education complaining of the violation.
